Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6022
Transfer or discharge of resident; conditions; procedure; involuntary transfer or discharge; notice requirements.

(1) A nursing home shall not transfer or discharge a resident except (a) upon his or her consent, (b) for medical reasons, (c) for the resident's safety or the safety of other residents or nursing home employees, (d) when rehabilitation is such that movement to a less restrictive setting is possible, or (e) for nonpayment for the resident's stay, except as prohibited by section 71-6023.01 or by Title XVIII or XIX of the Social Security Act as amended.

(2) Involuntary transfer from a nursing home or discharge of a resident shall be preceded by a minimum written notice of thirty days, except when subdivision (d) of subsection (1) of this section applies, five days written notice shall be given to the resident or his or her representative and when subdivision (e) of subsection (1) of this section applies, a resident shall be given ten days' written notice if his or her charges are five days or more in arrears. This subsection shall not apply when (a) an emergency transfer or discharge is mandated by the resident's health care needs and is in accord with the written orders and medical justification of the attending physician or (b) the transfer is mandated by the physical safety of other residents or nursing home employees, as documented in the nursing home records.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 782, § 5.